Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.277

Custom slaughter beef tags—Fee—Rules.

Any person licensed as a custom farm slaughterer under RCW 16.49.035 shall complete and attach a custom slaughter beef tag to each of the four quarters of all slaughtered cattle handled by the slaughterer. The tags must remain on the quarters until the quarters are cut and wrapped. Only the director may provide custom slaughter beef tags to custom farm slaughterers. The fee for each set of four custom slaughter beef tags is as prescribed in WAC 16-607-100 as it existed on January 1, 2000. The director may, by rule, establish criteria for the use of custom slaughter beef tags.

[ 2000 c 99 s 14.]